Utah statutes.
4-3-6.   Condemnation, embargo, denaturization of unfit milk or dairy products -- Unfit equipment.

(1) The department may condemn or embargo any milk or dairy product which is adulterated, misbranded, or not produced or processed in accordance with this chapter.

(2)  The department may condemn the use of any equipment, tank, or container used to produce, process, manufacture, or transport milk or dairy products that it finds, upon inspection, to be unclean or contaminated.

(3)  The department may mark or tag any condemned equipment, tank, or container with the words "this (equipment, tank, or container) is unfit to contain human food."

(4)  Condemned milk shall be decharacterized or denatured with harmless coloring or rennet by the department.

